California statutes. Unemployment Insurance Code
(c) May employ additional staff to carry out the activities as described in the local board’s plan.

(d) May solicit and accept contributions and grant funds from other sources.

(e) Shall not provide training services unless the Governor grants a written waiver in accordance with the process outlined in the Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act.

(f) May provide career services described in Section 3174(c)(2) of Title 29 of the United States Code through a one-stop delivery system or be designated or certified as a one-stop operator only with the agreement of the chief elected official in the local area and the Governor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 94, Sec. 27.   (AB 1270)   Effective January 1, 2016.   See conditional termination clause in Section 14007.)
-------------------------------------------

14208.

A local workforce development board may establish as a standing committee to provide information and to assist with planning, operational, and other issues relating to the provision of services to youth, which shall include community-based organizations with a demonstrated record of success in serving eligible youth. Members of this committee shall be appointed in conformity with the requirements of the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 94, Sec. 29.   (AB 1270)   Effective January 1, 2016.   See conditional termination clause in Section 14007.)
-------------------------------------------

14209.

It is the intent of the Legislature that if appointing members to any standing committee on the provision of youth services, the local workforce investment board and the local chief elected official shall endeavor to appoint:

(a) Representatives of youth who are enrolled in school and out-of-school youth.

(b) Representatives from the private sector.

(c) Representatives of local educational agencies serving youth.

(d) Representatives of private nonprofit agencies serving youth.

(e) Representatives of apprenticeship training programs serving youth.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 94, Sec. 30.   (AB 1270)   Effective January 1, 2016.   See conditional termination clause in Section 14007.)
-------------------------------------------

14211.

(a) (1) Beginning program year 2012, an amount equal to at least 25 percent of funds available under Title I of the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act of 2014 (Public Law 113-128) provided to local workforce investment boards for adults and dislocated workers shall be spent on workforce training programs. This minimum may be met either by spending 25 percent of those base formula funds on training or by combining a portion of those base formula funds with leveraged funds as specified in subdivision (b).

(2) Beginning program year 2016, an amount equal to at least 30 percent of funds available under Title I of the federal Workforce Innovation and
 Opportunity Act of 2014 (Public Law 113-128) provided to local workforce development boards for adults and dislocated workers shall be spent on workforce training programs. This minimum may be met either by spending 30 percent of those base formula funds on training or by combining a portion of those base formula funds with leveraged funds as specified in subdivision (b).

(3) Except as provided in subdivision (b), expenditures that shall count toward the minimum percentage of funds shall include only training services as defined in Section 3174(c)(3)(D) of Title 29 of the United States Code and the corresponding sections of the Code of Federal Regulations, including all of the following:

(A) Occupational skills training, including training for nontraditional
 employment.

(B) On-the-job training.

(C) Programs that combine workplace training with related instruction, which may include cooperative education programs.

(D) Training programs operated by the private sector.

(E) Skills upgrading and retraining.

(F) Entrepreneurial training.

(G) Incumbent worker training in accordance with Section 3174(d)(4) of Title 29 of the United States Code.

(H) Transitional jobs in accordance with Section 3174(d)(5) of Title 29 of the United States Code.

(I) Job readiness training provided in combination with any of the services described in subparagraphs (A) to (H), inclusive.

(J) Adult education and literacy activities provided in combination with services described in any of subparagraphs (A) to (G), inclusive.

(K) Customized training conducted with a commitment by an employer or group of employers to employ an individual upon successful completion of the training.

(b) (1) Local workforce development boards may receive a credit of up to 10 percent of their adult and dislocated worker formula fund base allocations for public education and training funds and private resources from industry
 and from joint labor-management trusts that are leveraged by a local workforce development board for expenditure on training and supportive services. This credit may be applied toward the minimum training requirements in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a).

(A) Leveraged funds that may be applied toward the credit allowed by this subdivision shall only include the following:

(i) Federal Pell Grants established under Title IV of the federal Higher
 Education Act of 1965 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1070 et seq.).

(ii) Programs authorized by the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act of 2014 (Public Law 113-128).

(iii) Trade adjustment assistance.

(iv) Department of Labor National Emergency Grants.

(v) Match funds from employers, industry, and industry associations.

(vi) Match funds from joint labor-management trusts.

(vii) Employment training panel grants.

(viii) Supportive services as defined by the federal Workforce Innovation
 and Opportunity Act of 2014 (Public Law 113-128) and the corresponding sections of the Code of Federal Regulations, but only for those individuals enrolled in training services
 for occupations in demand by industry, as defined in Section 3174(c)(3)(D) of Title 29 of the United States Code and the corresponding sections of the Code of Federal Regulations. Supportive services may include, but are not limited to, the costs of trainees’ or students’ books, safety and lab equipment, tools and any payment of costs permitted under the rules of the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act of 2014 and corresponding regulations pertaining to supportive services expenditures, including the rule that these supportive services costs are necessary for the individual to participate in training.

(ix) Temporary Assistance for Needy Families (TANF) funds spent on supportive services as defined by the federal Workforce Innovation and
 Opportunity Act of 2014 (Public Law 113-128) and the corresponding sections of the Code of Federal Regulations, for TANF enrolled individuals coenrolled in and receiving training services for occupations in demand by industry through the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act of 2014. Supportive services may include, but are not limited to, the costs of trainees’ or students’ books, safety and lab equipment, tools and any payment of costs permitted under the rules of the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act of 2014 and corresponding regulations pertaining to supportive services expenditures, including the rule that these supportive services costs are necessary for the individual to participate in training.

(x) Temporary Assistance for Needy Families (TANF) funds spent on transitional and subsidized employment for TANF enrolled individuals coenrolled in and receiving training services through the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act of 2014.

(xi) Any other local, state, or federal funds spent on training or supportive services for individuals enrolled in training, provided the individuals receiving the training are enrolled in the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act of 2014 for performance reporting and tracking purposes.

(xii) With the approval of the state board, any other public or private funds source not identified in this subparagraph that is used to provide training or supportive services for individuals who are also enrolled in training provided the individuals receiving the relevant services are enrolled in the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act of 2014 for performance reporting and tracking purposes.

(B) Credit for leveraged funds shall only be given if the local workforce development board keeps records of all training and supportive services expenditures it chooses to apply to the credit. Training and supportive services expenditures may only be applied to the credit if the relevant training costs can be independently verified by the Employment
 Development Department and, without exception, training participants must be coenrolled in the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act of 2014 performance monitoring system.

(2) The use of leveraged funds to partially meet the training requirements specified in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a) is the prerogative of a local workforce development board. A local workforce development board shall annually provide data to the Employment Development Department on the amount of leveraged funds used to partially meet the requirements of subdivision (a). This data shall disaggregate and report separately, the amount spent on both training and supportive services. Costs arising from the recordkeeping required to demonstrate compliance with the leveraging requirements
 of this subdivision are the responsibility of the local board.

(c) (1) At the end of each program year, the Employment Development Department shall calculate for each local workforce development board whether the local workforce development board met the expenditure requirements of this section.

(2) The Employment Development Department shall provide to each local workforce development board its individual calculations with respect to the expenditure requirements of this section.

(3) The Employment Development Department shall report annually to the Governor, the Legislature, and the California
 Workforce Development Board, on or before November 30, regarding the training and supportive services expenditures made by local workforce development boards pursuant to the expenditure requirements of this section.

(4) Consistent with the definitions and regulations of the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act of 2014, the Employment Development Department shall specify which expenditures qualify as training and supportive services expenditures. The annual report shall specify the total amount of federal funding provided to the state and to each of the local workforce development areas for the adult and dislocated persons programs and the amount of these federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act of 2014 funds expended for training services.

(5) Consistent with calculations required by paragraph (1), the report shall also include, for each local workforce
 development area, the total amount of leverage funds utilized as training expenditure allowances authorized by subdivision (b) to meet the expenditure requirements of this section. The report shall specify the share of leverage funds that were expended on both training and supportive services for each Local Workforce Development Area.

(6) A report submitted pursuant to this section shall comply with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(d) A local workforce development area that does not meet the requirements of subdivision (a) shall submit a corrective action plan to the Employment Development Department that provides reasons for not meeting the requirements and describes actions taken to address the identified expenditure deficiencies. A local workforce development area shall provide a corrective action plan to the Employment Development Department pursuant to this section within 90 days of receiving the calculations described in subdivision (c).

(e) For the purpose of this section, “program year” has the same meaning as provided in Section 667.100 of Title 20 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 324, Sec. 2.   (AB 1149)   Effective January 1, 2018.   See conditional termination clause in Section 14007.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Local Workforce Investment Plan  [14220. - 14223.]

14220.

Each local board shall develop and submit to the Governor a comprehensive four-year local plan in partnership with the appropriate chief local elected official. The local plan shall be consistent with the State Plan. If the local area is part of a planning region, the local board shall comply with Section 3121(c) of Title 29 of the United States Code in the preparation and submission of a regional plan. At the end of the first two-year period of the four-year local plan, each local board shall review the local plan and the local board, in partnership with the chief elected official, shall prepare and submit modifications to the local plan to reflect changes in labor market and economic conditions or in other factors affecting the implementation of the local
 plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 94, Sec. 33.   (AB 1270)   Effective January 1, 2016.   See conditional termination clause in Section 14007.)
-------------------------------------------

14221.

The local plan shall include all of the following:

(a) A description of the strategic planning elements consisting of each of the following:

(1) An analysis of the regional economic conditions, including, existing and emerging in-demand industry sectors and occupations and the employment needs of employers in those industry sectors and occupations.

(2) An analysis of the knowledge and skills needed to meet the employment needs of the employers in the region, including employment needs in in-demand industry sectors and occupations.

(3) An analysis of the workforce in the region, including current labor force employment and unemployment data, and information on labor market trends, and the educational and skill levels of the workforce in the region, including individuals with barriers to employment.

(4) An analysis of the workforce development activities, including education and training, in the region, including an analysis of the strengths and weaknesses of such services, and the capacity to provide such services, to address the identified education and skill needs of the workforce and the employment needs of employers in the region.

(5) A description of the local board's strategic vision and goals for preparing an educated and skilled workforce, including youth and individuals with barriers to employment, including goals relating to the performance accountability measures based on primary
 indicators of performance described in Section 3141(b)(2)(A) of Title 29 of the United States Code in order to support regional economic growth and economic self-sufficiency.

(6) Taking into account analyses described in paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, a strategy to work with the entities that carry out the core programs to align resources available to the local area, to achieve the strategic vision and goals described in paragraph (5).

(b) A description of the workforce development system in the local area that identifies the programs that are included in that system and how the local board will work with the entities carrying out core programs and other workforce development programs to support alignment to provide services, including programs of study authorized under the Carl D. Perkins Career and Technical Education Act of 2006 (20 U.S.C. 2301 et seq.), that support the
 strategy identified in the State Plan under Section 3112(b)(1)(E) of the Title 29 of the United States Code.

(c) A description of how the local board, working with the entities carrying out core programs, will expand access to employment, training, education, and supportive services for eligible individuals, particularly eligible individuals with barriers to employment, including how the local board will facilitate the development of career pathways and co-enrollment, as appropriate, in core programs, and improve access to activities leading to a recognized postsecondary credential, including a credential that is an industry-recognized certificate or certification, portable, and stackable.

(d) A description of the strategies and services that will be used in the local area in order to facilitate engagement of employers, including small employers and employers in in-demand industry
 sectors and occupations, in workforce development programs, support a local workforce development system that meets the needs of businesses in the local area, better coordinate workforce development programs and economic development, and strengthen linkages between the one-stop delivery system and unemployment insurance programs. This may include the implementation of initiatives such as incumbent worker training programs, on-the-job training programs, customized training programs, industry and sector strategies, career pathways initiatives, utilization of effective business intermediaries, and other business services and strategies, designed to meet the needs of employers in the corresponding region in support of the strategy described in paragraph (5) of subdivision (a).

(e) A description of how the local board will coordinate workforce investment activities carried out in the local area with economic development activities carried out in the
 region in which the local area is located, or planning region, and promote entrepreneurial skills training and microenterprise services.

(f) A description of the one-stop delivery system in the local area, including all of the following:

(1) A description of how the local board will ensure the continuous improvement of eligible providers of services through the system and ensure that such providers meet the employment needs of local employers, and workers and jobseekers.

(2) A description of how the local board will facilitate access to services provided through the one-stop delivery system, including in remote areas, through the use of technology and through other means.

(3) A description of how entities within the one-stop delivery system, including
 one-stop operators and the one-stop partners, will comply with Section 3248 of Title 29 of the United States Code, if applicable, and applicable provisions of the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 12101 et seq.) regarding the physical and programmatic accessibility of facilities, programs and services, technology, and materials for individuals with disabilities, including providing staff training and support for addressing the needs of individuals with disabilities.

(4) A description of the roles and resource contributions of the one-stop partners.

(g) A description and assessment of the type and availability of adult and dislocated worker employment and training activities in the local area.

(h) A description of how the local board will coordinate workforce investment activities carried out in
 the local area with statewide rapid response activities, as described in Section 3174(a)(2)(A) of Title 29 of the United States Code.

(i) A description and assessment of the type and availability of youth workforce investment activities in the local area, including activities for youth who are individuals with disabilities, which description and assessment shall include an identification of successful models of such youth workforce investment activities.

(j) A description of how the local board will coordinate education and workforce investment activities carried out in the local area with relevant secondary and postsecondary education programs and activities to coordinate strategies, enhance services, and avoid duplication of services.

(k) A description of how the local board will coordinate workforce investment
 activities carried out under this article in the local area with the provision of transportation, including public transportation, and other appropriate supportive services in the local area.

(l) A description of plans and strategies for, and assurances concerning, maximizing coordination of services provided by the state employment service under the Wagner-Peyser Act (29 U.S.C. Sec. 49 et seq.) and services provided in the local area through the one-stop delivery system, to improve service delivery and avoid duplication of services.

(m) A description of how the local board will coordinate workforce investment activities carried out in the local area with the provision of adult education and literacy activities in the local area, including a description of how the local board will carry out, consistent with subparagraphs (A) and (B)(i) of Section 3122(d)(11) of Title 29 of the
 United States Code and Section 3322 of Title 29 of the United States Code, the review of local applications.

(n) A description of the replicated cooperative agreements, as defined in Section 3122(d)(11) of Title 29 of the United States Code between the local board or other local entities described in Section 101(a)(11)(B) of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 721(a)(11)(B)) and the local office of a designated state agency or designated state unit administering programs carried out under Title I of that act, other than Section 112 or Part C of that Title (29 U.S.C. Secs. 732 and 741) and subject to Section 3151(f) of Title 29 of the United States Code, in accordance with Section 101(a)(11) of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 721(a)(11)) with respect to efforts that will enhance the provision of services to individuals with disabilities and to other individuals, such as cross training of staff, technical assistance, use
 and sharing of information, cooperative efforts with employers, and other efforts at cooperation, collaboration, and coordination.

(o) An identification of the entity responsible for the disbursal of grant funds described in Section 3122(d)(12)(B)(i)(III) of Title 29 of the United States Code, as determined by the chief elected official or the Governor under Section 3122(d)(12)(B)(i) of Title 29 of the United States Code.

(p) A description of the competitive process to be used to award the subgrants and contracts in the local area for activities carried out pursuant to this act.

(q) A description of the local levels of performance negotiated with the Governor and chief elected official pursuant to Section 3141(c) of Title 29 of the United States Code, to be used to measure the performance of the local area and to be
 used by the local board for measuring the performance of the local fiscal agent, where appropriate, eligible providers, and the one-stop delivery system, in the local area.

(r) A description of the actions the local board will take toward becoming or remaining a high-performing board, consistent with the factors developed by the board pursuant to Section 3111(d)(6) of Title 29 of the United States Code. This federal requirement is separate and apart from state standards pertaining to the certification of high-performance local workforce development boards.

(s) A description of how training services will be provided in accordance with Section 3174(c)(3)(G) of Title 29 of the United States Code, including, if contracts for the training services will be used, how the use of such contracts will be coordinated with the use of individual training accounts and how the local board will
 ensure informed customer choice in the selection of training programs regardless of how the training services are to be provided.

(t) A description of the process used by the local board, consistent with subsection (d), to provide an opportunity for public comment, including comment by representatives of businesses and comment by representatives of labor organizations, and input into the development of the local plan, prior to submission of the plan.

(u) A description of how one-stop centers are implementing and transitioning to an integrated, technology-enabled intake and case management information system for programs carried out under this act and programs carried out by one-stop partners.

(v) Any other information as the Governor may require.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 94, Sec. 35.   (AB 1270)   Effective January 1, 2016.   See conditional termination clause in Section 14007.)
-------------------------------------------

14222.

To the extent permitted under the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act, the local board may submit a local unified plan that includes or integrates the local workforce investment and other local workforce plans such as:

(a) An instructional and job training plan required by Section 10200 of the Education Code.

(b) A plan for community college curriculum development or redesign required pursuant to Section 79202 of the Education Code.

(c) A county plan for CalWORKs required by Section 10531 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(d) A local welfare-to-work plan required by Section 5063, to the extent permitted under federal law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 94, Sec. 36.   (AB 1270)   Effective January 1, 2016.   See conditional termination clause in Section 14007.)
-------------------------------------------

14223.

Prior to the date upon which the local board submits a local plan, the local board shall make available copies of a proposed local plan to the public through electronic and other means, like public hearings and local news media, allow members of the public, including representatives of business, representatives of labor organizations, and representatives of education to submit comments on the proposed local plan to the local board not later than the end of the 30-day period beginning on the date on which the proposed local plan is made available and submit the plan to the Governor along with any comments that were in disagreement with the plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 94, Sec. 37.   (AB 1270)   Effective January 1, 2016.   See conditional termination clause in Section 14007.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. One-Stop Career Center System [14230. - 14235.]

14230.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that:

(1) California deliver comprehensive workforce services to jobseekers, students, and employers through a system of one-stop career centers.

(2) Services and resources target high-wage industry sectors with career advancement opportunities.

(3) Universal access to career services shall be available to adult residents regardless of income, education, employment barriers, or other eligibility requirements. Career services shall include, but not be limited to:

(A) Outreach, intake, and orientation to services available through the one-stop delivery system.

(B) Initial assessment of skill levels, aptitudes, abilities, and supportive service needs.

(C) Job search and placement assistance.

(D) Career counseling, where appropriate.

(E) Provision of labor market information.

(F) Provision of program performance and cost information on eligible providers of training services and local area performance measures.

(G) Provision of information on supportive services in the local area.

(H) Provision of information on the filing of claims for unemployment compensation benefits and unemployment
 compensation disability benefits.

(I) Assistance in establishing eligibility for welfare-to-work activities pursuant to Section 11325.8 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, and financial aid assistance.

(J) Comprehensive and specialized assessments of skill levels and service needs, including learning disability screening.

(K) Development of individual employment plans.

(L) Counseling.

(M) Career planning.

(N) Short-term prevocational services to prepare an individual for training or employment.

(4) State and federally funded workforce education, training, and employment programs shall be integrated in the one-stop delivery system to achieve universal access to the career services described in paragraph (3).

(5) Training services shall be made available to individuals who have met the requirements for career services, have been unable to obtain or retain employment through career services, are in need of training services to obtain or retain employment that leads to economic self-sufficiency or wages comparable to, or higher than, wages from previous employment, have the skills and qualifications to successfully participate in the training, and have selected a program of services directly linked to occupations in demand in the local or regional area. Training services may
 include:

(A) Occupational skill training including training for nontraditional employment.

(B) On-the-job training.

(C) Programs that combine workplace training with related instruction.

(D) Training programs operated by the private sector.

(E) Skill upgrading and retraining.

(F) Entrepreneurial training.

(G) Incumbent worker training, in accordance with Section 134(d)(4) of the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act.

(H) Transitional jobs, in accordance with Section 134(d)(5) of the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act.

(I) Job readiness training, provided in combination with any service under subparagraphs (A) to (H), inclusive.

(J) Adult education and literacy activities, including vocational English as a second language, provided in combination with subparagraphs (A) through (G), inclusive.

(K) Customized training conducted by an employer or a group of employers or a labor-management training partnership with a commitment to employ an individual upon completion of the training.

(6) As prescribed in the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity
 Act, adult recipients of public assistance, other low-income adults, and individuals who are basic skills deficient shall be given priority for training services and career services described in Section 134(d)(2)(A)(xii) of the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act.

(b) Each local workforce development board shall establish at least one full service one-stop career center in the local workforce development area. Each full service one-stop career center shall have all entities required to be partners in Section 3151 of Title 29 of the United States Code as partners and shall provide jobseekers with integrated employment, education, training, and job search services. Additionally, employers will be provided with access to comprehensive career and labor market information, job placement, economic development information, performance
 and program information on service providers, and other such services
 as the businesses in the community may require.

(c) Local boards may also establish affiliated and specialized centers, as defined in the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act of 2014, which shall act as portals into the larger local one-stop system, but are not required to have all of the partners specified for full service one-stop centers.

(d) Each local board shall develop a policy for identifying individuals who, because of their skills or experience, should be referred immediately to training services. To the extent permitted under the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act of 2014, this policy, along with the methods for referral of individuals between the one-stop operators and the one-stop partners for appropriate services and activities,
 shall be contained in the memorandum of understanding between the local board and the one-stop partners.

(e) (1) The California Workforce Development Board and each local board shall ensure that programs and services funded by the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act of 2014 and directed to apprenticeable occupations, including preapprenticeship training, are conducted, to the maximum extent feasible, in coordination with one or more apprenticeship programs approved by the Division of Apprenticeship Standards for the occupation and geographic area. The California Workforce Development Board and each local board shall also develop a policy of fostering collaboration between community colleges and approved apprenticeship
 programs in the geographic area to provide preapprenticeship training, apprenticeship training, and continuing education in apprenticeable occupations through the approved apprenticeship programs.

(2) (A) The California Workforce Development Board and each local board also shall ensure, to the maximum extent feasible, that federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act of 2014 funds respectively awarded by them for purposes of
 preapprenticeship training in the building and construction trades fund programs and services that do both of the following:

(i) Follow
 the Multi-Craft Core Curriculum implemented by the State Department of Education for its pilot project with California Partnership Academies.

(ii) Develop a plan for outreach and retention for women participants in the preapprenticeship program to help increase the representation of women in the building and construction trades.

(B) The California Workforce Development Board shall develop policies for the implementation of these provisions.

(f) In light of California’s diverse population, each one-stop career center should have the capacity to provide the appropriate services to the full range of languages and cultures represented in the community served by the one-stop career center.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 692, Sec. 1.   (AB 2288)   Effective January 1, 2017.   See conditional termination clause in Section 14007.)
-------------------------------------------

14230.5.

For purposes of this division and any laws governing workforce development programs, and to the extent permitted under Chapter 32 of Title 29 of the United States Code and any related regulations, entrance into a registered apprenticeship program shall be considered placement into a job.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 94, Sec. 39.   (AB 1270)   Effective January 1, 2016.   See conditional termination clause in Section 14007.)
-------------------------------------------

14231.

(a) The local providers of the following programs or activities shall be required partners in the local one-stop system:

(1) Programs authorized under Title I of the Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act.

(2) Programs authorized under the Wagner-Peyser Act (29 U.S.C. Sec. 49 et seq.).

(3) Adult education and literacy activities authorized under Title II of the Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act.

(4) Programs authorized under Title I of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec.
 720 et seq.) other than Section 112 or Part C of the act (29 U.S.C. Sec. 732 and 741). 

(5) Activities authorized under Title V of the Older Americans Act of 1965 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 3056 et seq.).

(6) Career and technical education programs at the postsecondary level authorized under the Carl D. Perkins Career and Technical Education Act of 2006 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 2301 et seq.). 

(7) Activities authorized under Chapter 2 of Title II of the Trade Act of 1974 (19 U.S.C. Sec. 2271 et seq.).

(8) Activities authorized under Chapter 41 (commencing with Section 4100) of Title 38 of the United States Code.

(9) Employment and training activities carried out under the Community Services Block Grant Act
 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 9901 et seq.).

(10) Employment and training activities carried out by the Department of Housing and Urban Development.

(11) Programs authorized by this code, in accordance with applicable federal law.

(12) Programs authorized under Section 212 of the Second Chance Act of 2007 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 17532).

(13) Programs authorized under Part A of Title IV of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 601 et seq.). 

(b) Community-based organizations that provide career services as described in subparagraphs (J) to (N), inclusive, of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 14230, shall be encouraged to be one-stop partners.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 94, Sec. 40.   (AB 1270)   Effective January 1, 2016.   See conditional termination clause in Section 14007.)
-------------------------------------------

14232.

In conformity with the requirements of Section 3151 of Title 29 of the United States Code, and all applicable state and federal laws and regulations, the local board, with the agreement of the chief local elected official for the local area, shall develop and enter into a memorandum of understanding with the local one-stop partners, designate, certify, and terminate one-stop operators, and conduct oversight over the local one-stop delivery system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 94, Sec. 41.   (AB 1270)   Effective January 1, 2016.   See conditional termination clause in Section 14007.)
-------------------------------------------

14233.

One-stop career center operators shall recognize and comply with applicable labor agreements affecting employees of one-stop career centers, including the right to access by labor representatives pursuant to the Ralph C. Dills Act (Chapter 10.3 (commencing with Section 3512) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 630, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2007.   See conditional termination clause in Section 14007.)
-------------------------------------------

14234.

In order to avoid a conflict of interest, operators of one-stop career centers that issue vouchers shall not be the recipient of vouchers issued by their center without the approval of the chief local elected official and the state board in instances when there are no other potential one-stop partners in the local area.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 630, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2007.   See conditional termination clause in Section 14007.)
-------------------------------------------

14235.

To the full extent permitted by federal law, required by federal law, or both, the Employment Development Department shall utilize its Wagner-Peyser funded activities and programs to support local one-stop career centers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 94, Sec. 42.   (AB 1270)   Effective January 1, 2016.   See conditional termination clause in Section 14007.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. The California Creative Workforce Act of 2021 [14240. - 14246.]

14240.

This article shall be known, and may be cited, as the California Creative Workforce Act of 2021.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 767, Sec. 3.   (SB 628)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative as prescribed in Section 14246.   See conditional termination clause in Section 14007.)
-------------------------------------------

14241.

The purpose of this article is:

(a) To establish creative arts workforce development as a state priority.

(b) To recognize creative workers across California as essential workers and contributors for overcoming California’s greatest challenges through the rebuilding of California’s cultural landscape into a more equitable and just framework.

(c) To develop and support a workforce career development pipeline that serves creative workers at all stages of their careers. 

(d) To create equitable opportunities for
 career exploration and participation in creative work for individuals and communities who may have faced barriers to participation and employment in creative work as a result of low levels of public and private investment, limited exposure to arts programming, or other social or economic barriers to participation and employment in creative work.

(e) To promote employment and earn and learn job training opportunities for creative workers throughout the state.
